California statutes. Education Code
(3) The department shall provide electronic notification of the
 availability of renewal application materials to certified nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies at least 120 days before the date their current certification expires.

(c) If the applicant operates a facility or program on more than one site, each site shall be certified.

(d) If the applicant is part of a larger program or facility on the same site, the Superintendent shall consider the effect of the total program on the applicant. A copy of the policies and standards for the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and the larger program shall be available to the Superintendent.

(e) (1) Before certification, the Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review of the facility and program for
 which the applicant seeks certification. The Superintendent may be assisted by representatives of the special education local plan area in which the applicant is located and a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency representative who does not have a conflict of interest with the applicant. The Superintendent shall conduct an additional onsite review of the facility and program within three years of the effective date of the certification, unless the Superintendent conditionally certifies the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, or unless the Superintendent receives a formal complaint against the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. In the latter two cases, the Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review at least annually.

(2) In carrying out paragraph (1), the Superintendent may verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian
 school or agency has received a successful criminal background check clearance and has enrolled in subsequent arrest notice service, pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(3) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, the Superintendent shall also do all of the following before certifying a nonpublic, nonsectarian school located outside of California:

(A) Review assurances provided pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) relating to behavioral interventions to evaluate consistency with California laws.

(B) Ensure that pupils have been provided a copy of their rights and procedural safeguards, as referenced in Section 300.504(a) of
 Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and information on how to contact the department’s Constituent Services Office, upon admission to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school and that this information is accessible and require the telephone number for the department’s
 Constituent Services Office to be prominently displayed at the nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(C) Review policies, procedures, and practices of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school to determine if there is a clear and confidential process for residents to report grievances without fear of retaliation and review the process for investigating and reporting internal and external resident complaints.

(D) Examine the use of positive behavioral reinforcement systems, including if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school correctly implements behavior intervention pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 56520) and manifestation determinations pursuant to Section 300.530(e) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and provide a copy of the nonpublic, nonsectarian
 school’s policies on behavior intervention to pupils and parents of pupils enrolled in the nonpublic, nonsectarian
 school.

(E) Review protocols for identifying signs of abuse or neglect, both physical and psychological, for consistency with the mandated reporting requirements of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, ensure that all staff are trained to recognize these signs, and review any behavior emergency reports required pursuant to Section 56521.1 to ensure compliance with that section.

(4) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, a local educational agency that enters into a master contract with a nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall conduct, at minimum, all of the following:

(A) An onsite visit to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school before placement of a pupil if the local educational agency does not have any
 pupils enrolled at the school at the time of placement.

(B) At least one onsite monitoring visit during each school year to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school at which the local educational agency has a pupil attending and with which it maintains a master contract. The monitoring visit shall include, but is not limited to, a review of services provided to the pupil through the individual service agreement between the local educational agency and the nonpublic, nonsectarian school, a review of progress the pupil is making toward the goals set forth in the pupil’s individualized education program, a review of progress the pupil is making toward the goals set forth in the pupil’s behavioral intervention plan, if applicable, an observation of the pupil during instruction, a walkthrough of the facility, and, for a pupil placed in a nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school located outside of California, an in-person interview with the pupil, in a manner consistent with the pupil’s individualized education program, to evaluate the pupil’s health and safety. The local educational agency shall report the findings resulting from the monitoring visit to the department, using the “Local Educational Agency Onsite Visit for Nonpublic School” form developed and published by the department on its internet website, within 60 calendar days of the onsite visit. On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall update the form to additionally require, for nonpublic, nonsectarian schools located outside of California, all of the following findings to be reported to the department:

(i) A summary of the local educational agency’s interview of pupils to assess their perceptions of the nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school and the services provided, including whether pupils feel that they are treated with respect and dignity and whether nonpublic, nonsectarian school staff maintain appropriate professional boundaries. The local educational agency may also use the tool used by the Superintendent to conduct interviews or develop its own interview tool and shall respect any limitations caused by the pupil’s disability and conduct the interview in a manner consistent with the pupil’s individualized education program.

(ii) Evidence of positive behavioral support, for which the local educational agency shall examine the use of positive behavioral reinforcement systems, including if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school correctly implements behavior intervention pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 56520) and manifestation
 determinations pursuant to Section 300.530(e) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iii) Evidence of screening for abuse and neglect, for which the local educational agency shall review the protocols for identifying signs of abuse or neglect, both physical and psychological, and ensure that all staff are trained to recognize these signs through a review of any behavior emergency reports required pursuant to Section 56521.1.

(C) A quarterly check-in with a pupil attending the nonpublic, nonsectarian school located outside of California through an unmonitored telephone call, in a manner consistent with the pupil’s individualized education program.

(f) (1) The Superintendent shall make a
 determination on an application within 120 days of receipt of the application and shall certify, conditionally certify, or deny certification to the applicant. If the Superintendent fails to take one of these actions within 120 days, the applicant is automatically granted conditional certification for a period terminating on August 31 of the current school year. If certification is denied, the Superintendent shall provide reasons for the denial. The Superintendent shall not certify the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency for a period longer than one year.

(2) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, for a nonpublic, nonsectarian school located outside of California, the Superintendent shall make available, upon request from a local educational agency or a special education local plan area, the following information, if available:

(A) The certification status of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, including whether certification was granted, denied, revoked, suspended, or granted with conditions.

(B) A summary of the findings supporting the Superintendent’s determination, including any corrective actions or areas of noncompliance identified.

(C) Access to relevant documentation used to support the determination, including compliance review reports and any findings resulting from onsite monitoring visits.

(3) A local educational agency shall disclose the information received in paragraph (2), if available, to the parent or guardian at the time the individualized education program
 team considers placement of the pupil in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(4) The local educational agency shall document in the individualized education program that the information described in paragraph (2), if available, was provided to the parent or guardian and that the parent or guardian was given an opportunity to review and discuss the information as part of the placement decision.

(5) This subdivision does not authorize the disclosure of any personally identifiable information and shall be consistent with applicable state and federal pupil privacy laws.

(g) Certification becomes effective on the date the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency meets all the application requirements and
 is approved by the Superintendent. Certification may be retroactive if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency met all the requirements of this section on the date the retroactive certification is effective. Certification expires on December 31 of the terminating year.

(h) The Superintendent annually shall review the certification of each nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. For this purpose, a certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency annually shall update its application between August 1 and October 31, unless the state board grants a waiver pursuant to Section 56101. The Superintendent may conduct an onsite review as part of the annual review.

(i) (1) The Superintendent shall conduct an investigation of a nonpublic, nonsectarian
 school or agency onsite at any time without prior notice if there is substantial reason to believe that there is an immediate danger to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. The Superintendent shall document the concern and submit it to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency at the time of the onsite investigation. The Superintendent shall require a written response to any noncompliance or deficiency found.

(2) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall notify the department and the local educational agency with which it has a master contract of any pupil-involved incident at the school or agency in which law enforcement was contacted. This notification shall be provided in writing, no later than one business day after the incident occurred.

(3) With respect to a
 nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, the Superintendent shall conduct an investigation, which may include an unannounced onsite visit, if the Superintendent receives evidence of a significant deficiency in the quality of educational services provided, a violation of Section 56366.9, or noncompliance with the policies expressed by subdivision (b) of Section 1501 of the Health and Safety Code by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. The Superintendent shall document the complaint and the results of the investigation and shall provide copies of the documentation to the complainant, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, and the contracting local educational agency.

(4) Violations or noncompliance documented pursuant to paragraph (1) or (3) shall be reflected in the status of the certification of the nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school or agency, at the discretion of the Superintendent, pending an approved plan of correction by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. The department shall retain for a period of 10 years all violations pertaining to certification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(5) In carrying out this subdivision, the Superintendent may verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency received a successful criminal background check clearance and has enrolled in subsequent arrest notice service, pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(j) The Superintendent shall monitor the facilities, the educational environment, and the quality of the educational program,
 including the teaching staff, the credentials authorizing service, the standards-based core curriculum being employed, and the standards-focused instructional materials used, of an existing certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency on a three-year cycle, as follows:

(1) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall complete a self-review in year one.

(2) The Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency in year two.

(3) The Superintendent shall conduct a followup visit to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency in year three.

(k) (1) During an onsite review of a nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school located outside of California, the Superintendent shall interview all pupils with individualized education programs to discuss progress and address any concerns respecting any limitations due to the pupils’ disabilities at the following times:

(A) If the nonpublic, nonsectarian school is the subject of an investigation pursuant to subdivision (i).

(B) If there is a change in certification status or during the year-three monitoring followup visit specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).

(C) If the nonpublic, nonsectarian school has pupil-level findings from year two.

(2) On or before July 1, 2026, the Superintendent shall develop an
 interview tool to be used for interviews with pupils to assess the pupils’ perceptions of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school and the services provided, discuss progress, and address any concerns. The interview tool shall require interviews to include, at minimum, the pupil’s perceptions of being treated with respect and dignity and of whether the staff maintain appropriate professional boundaries. This tool shall be made available to local educational agencies upon request to conduct interviews.

(l) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall not certify a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that proposes to initiate or expand services to pupils currently educated in the immediate prior fiscal year in a juvenile court program, community school pursuant to Section 56150, or other nonspecial
 education program, including independent study or adult school, or both, unless the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency notifies the county superintendent of schools and the special education local plan area in which the proposed new or expanded nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is located of its intent to seek certification.

(2) The notification shall occur no later than the December 1 before the new fiscal year in which the proposed or expanding school or agency intends to initiate services. The notice shall include the following:

(A) The specific date upon which the proposed nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is to be established.

(B) The location of the proposed program or facility.

(C) The number of pupils proposed for services, the number of pupils currently served in the juvenile court, community school, or other nonspecial education program, the current school services including special education and related services provided for these pupils, and the specific program of special education and related services to be provided under the proposed program.

(D) The reason for the proposed change in services.

(E) The number of staff who will provide special education and designated instruction and services and hold a current valid California credential or license in the service rendered.

(3) In addition to the requirements in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive,
 the Superintendent shall require and consider the following in determining whether to certify a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency as described in this subdivision:

(A) A complete statement of the information required as part of the notice under paragraph (1).

(B) Documentation of the steps taken in preparation for the conversion to a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, including information related to changes in the population to be served and the services to be provided pursuant to each pupil’s individualized education program.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the certification becomes effective no earlier than July 1 if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency provided the notification required
 pursuant to paragraph (1).

(m) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall not certify or renew the certification of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school that also operates a licensed children’s institution, unless all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The entity operating the nonpublic, nonsectarian school maintains separate financial records for each entity that it operates, with each nonpublic, nonsectarian school identified separately from any licensed children’s institution that it operates.

(B) The entity submits an annual budget that identifies the projected costs and revenues for each entity and demonstrates that the rates to be charged are reasonable to support the operation of the
 entity.

(C) The entity submits an entitywide annual audit that identifies its costs and revenues, by entity, in accordance with generally accepted accounting and auditing principles. The audit shall clearly document the amount of moneys received and expended on the educational program provided by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(D) The relationship between various entities operated by the same entity are documented, defining the responsibilities of the entities. The documentation shall clearly identify the services to be provided as part of each program, for example, the residential or medical program, the mental health program, or the educational program. The entity shall not seek funding from a public agency for a service, either separately or as part of a package of
 services, if the service is funded by another public agency, either separately or as part of a package of services.

(2) For purposes of this section, “licensed children’s institution” has the same meaning as it is defined by Section 56155.5.

(n) (1) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall be charged a reasonable fee for certification. The Superintendent may adjust the fee annually commensurate with the statewide average percentage inflation adjustment computed for local control funding formula allocations pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, of unified school districts with greater than 1,500 units of average daily attendance if the percentage increase is reflected in the school district local control funding formula allocation
 pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for inflation purposes. For purposes of this section, the base fee shall be the following:(1) 1–5 pupils $300(2) 6–10 pupils 500(3) 11–24 pupils 1,000(4) 25–75 pupils 1,500(5) 76 pupils and over 2,000(2) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall pay this fee when it applies for certification and when it updates its application for annual renewal by the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall use these fees to conduct onsite reviews, which may include field experts. A fee shall not be refunded if
 the application is withdrawn or is denied by the Superintendent.

(o) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies that provide special education and designated instruction and services using administrators and staff who hold a certificate, permit, or other document equivalent to that which staff in a public school are required to hold in the service rendered are eligible to receive certification. Only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies located outside of California that employ staff who hold a current valid credential or license to render special education and related services as required by that state shall be eligible to be certified. Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, this paragraph shall not apply to
 administrators.

(2) Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, notwithstanding any other law, only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies that provide special education and related services using administrators who hold or are in the process of obtaining a credential, degree, or license in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) are eligible to be certified.

(3) The state board shall develop regulations to implement this subdivision.

(p) In addition to meeting the standards adopted by the state board, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall provide written assurances that it meets all applicable standards relating to fire, health, sanitation, and building safety.

(q) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (n) of Section 44237, and for purposes of enabling the Superintendent to carry out the duties pursuant to this section, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall, upon demand, make available to the Superintendent evidence of a successful criminal background check clearance and enrollment in subsequent arrest notice service, conducted pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(2) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall retain the evidence and store it in a locked file separate from other files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 4.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.2.

(a) A local educational agency, nonpublic, nonsectarian school, or nonpublic, nonsectarian agency may petition the Superintendent to waive one or more of the requirements under Sections 56365, 56366, 56366.3, and 56366.6. The petition shall state the reasons for the waiver request, and shall include the following:

(1) Sufficient documentation to demonstrate that the waiver is necessary to the content and implementation of a specific pupil’s individualized education program and
 the pupil’s current placement.

(2) The period of time that the waiver will be effective during any one school year.

(3) Documentation and assurance that the waiver does not abrogate any right provided to individuals with exceptional needs and their parents or guardians under state or federal law, and does not hinder the compliance of a local educational agency with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and federal regulations relating to those acts.

(b) No waiver shall be granted for reimbursement of those costs prohibited under Article 4 (commencing with Section 56836.20) of Chapter 7.2 of Part 30 or for the
 certification requirements pursuant to Section 56366.1 unless approved by the board pursuant to Section 56101.

(c) In submitting the annual report on waivers granted under Section 56101 and this section to the board, the Superintendent shall specify information related to the provision of special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs through contracts with nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies located in the state, nonpublic, nonsectarian school and agency placements in facilities located out of state, and the specific section waived pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.4.

(a) The Superintendent may revoke or suspend the certification of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency for any of the following reasons:

(1) Violation of an applicable state or federal rule or regulation, or aiding, abetting, or permitting the violation of an applicable state or federal rule or regulation.

(2) Falsification or intentional misrepresentation of an element of the application, pupil records, or program presented for certification purposes.

(3) Conduct in the operation or maintenance of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that is
 harmful to the health, welfare, or safety of an individual with exceptional needs, including, but not limited to, the use of interventions prohibited by subdivision (d) of Section 56521.1 and subdivision (a) of Section 49005.8.

(4) Failure to comply with a provision in the master contract with the local educational agency.

(5) Failure to notify the department in writing of any of the following within 45 days of the occurrence:

(A) Changes in credentialed, licensed, or registered staff who render special education and related services, ownership, management, or control of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(B) Major modification or relocation
 of facilities.

(C) Significant modification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency program.

(6) Failure to implement recommendations and compliance requirements following an onsite review of the school or agency.

(7) Failure to provide appropriate services, supplies, equipment, or facilities for a pupil as required in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(8) Failure to notify the Superintendent in writing within 10 days of the revocation or suspension of a license or permit, including, but not limited to, a residential care license, business license, or other required license or permit.

(9) Failure to implement a pupil’s individualized education program.

(10) Failure to notify the Superintendent in writing within 10 days of the death of a pupil or any other individual of unnatural causes within the school or agency, including the circumstances surrounding the death and appropriate preventative measures being taken or recommended.

(b) If an investigation conducted by the department results in a finding that pupil health or safety has been compromised or is in danger of being compromised at a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, the department may immediately suspend or revoke the certification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(c) The Superintendent shall notify contracting
 local educational agencies and the special education local plan area in which the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is located of the determination to suspend or revoke state certification.

(d) If the Superintendent determines that a nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school or agency has violated the certification requirements pursuant to this section and revokes the certification, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency; the site administrator, business, organization, or entity involved in the administration of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency whose certification was revoked; and the site administrator, business, organization, or entity whose nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency certification was revoked at any time previously, shall not be eligible to apply for recertification of the school or agency for two full years from the date of revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.45.

(a) (1) A contracting local educational agency and a charter school shall, within 14 days of becoming aware of any change to the certification status of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, notify parents of pupils of the local educational agency or charter school who attend the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency through email or regular mail notice of the change in certification status and include a copy of the procedural safeguards as specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500).

(2) The contracting local educational agency or charter school shall maintain a record of the notice given pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall make this notice available for inspection upon request of the
 department.

(b) For purposes of this section, becoming aware of any change in certification status may include, but is not limited to, receiving notification pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56366.4 of a determination to suspend or revoke the certification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, including, but not limited to, a determination resulting from a department investigation into pupil restraint or seclusion.

(c) For purposes of this section, “parent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 56028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (AB 611)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a request from a nonpublic, nonsectarian school for payment for services provided under a contract entered into pursuant to Sections 56365 and 56366, the local educational agency shall either (1) send a warrant for the amount requested within 45 days, or (2) notify the nonpublic, nonsectarian school within 10 working days of any reason why the requested payment shall not be paid.

(b) If the local educational agency fails to comply with subdivision (a), the
 nonpublic, nonsectarian school may require the local educational agency to pay an additional amount of 112 percent of the unpaid balance per month until full payment is made. The local educational agency may not claim reimbursement from the state for the additional amount pursuant to any provision of law, including any provision contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) Any educational funds received from a local educational agency for the educational costs of individuals with exceptional needs it has placed in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools shall be used solely for those purposes and not for the costs of a residential program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 914, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.6.

(a) Within 20 working days following the nonpublic, nonsectarian school’s or agency’s receipt of the notice of denial, revocation, or suspension of certification, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency may file a written petition to request a review of the decision by the superintendent. The petition may include written arguments or a request to present an oral argument.

(b) Within 30 working days after the receipt of the written petition, the superintendent or a designee
 shall review the decision and the applicant’s petition and render a written, reasoned decision that shall be the final administrative decision. The designee of the superintendent shall be impartial, unbiased, and shall not have participated in the department decision to deny, revoke, or suspend the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency certification.

(c) Any public education agency that contracts with a certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency may request the superintendent to review the status of the nonpublic school or agency. The request shall be in writing and a copy sent to the nonpublic school or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 939, Sec. 14.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.8.

The department, as a part of its certification process and complaint investigation process for nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide advance notice of certification reviews to the contracting local educational agency, and to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency under certification review.

(b) Provide advance notice of complaint investigations to the contracting local educational
 agency.

(c) Include the contracting local educational agency in certification reviews and complaint investigations.

(d) Transmit final reports of certification reviews and complaint investigations to local educational agencies, placement agencies, and other public educational agencies that contract with the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.9.

A licensed children’s institution at which individuals with exceptional needs reside shall not require as a condition of residential placement that it provide the appropriate educational programs to those individuals through a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency owned, operated by, or associated with, a licensed children’s institution. Those services may only be provided if the special education local plan area determines that appropriate public alternative educational programs are not available. A licensed children’s institution shall not refer a pupil to, or place a pupil in, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 571, Sec. 5.   (SB 121)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.10.

In addition to the certification requirements set forth in Sections 56366 and 56366.1, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school that provides special education and related services to an individual with exceptional needs shall certify in writing to the Superintendent that it meets all of the following requirements:

(a) It will not accept a pupil with exceptional needs if it cannot provide or ensure the provision of the services outlined in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(b) Pupils have access to the following educational materials, services, and programs that are consistent with each pupil’s individualized education program:

(1) (A) For kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, state-adopted, standards-based, core curriculum and instructional materials, including technology-based materials as defined in Section 60010.

(B) For grades 9 to 12, inclusive, standards-based, core curriculum and instructional materials, including technology-based materials as defined in Section 60010, used by any local educational agency that contracts with the nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(2) College preparatory courses.

(3) Extracurricular activities, such as art, sports, music, and academic clubs.

(4) Career preparation and vocational training, consistent with transition plans pursuant to state and federal law.

(5) Supplemental assistance, including individual academic tutoring, psychological counseling, and career and college counseling.

(c) The teachers and staff provide academic instruction and support services to pupils with the goal of integrating pupils into the least restrictive environment pursuant to federal law.

(d) The school has and abides by a written policy for pupil discipline that is consistent with state and federal law and regulations.

(e) For a school serving pupils with significant behavioral needs or who are on behavioral intervention plans, the school has an individual onsite during school hours who is qualified, and responsible for the design, planning, and implementation of behavioral interventions, as authorized under Section 3051.23 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school provides annual training to all staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday. The training is also provided within 30 days of employment to new staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday. The nonpublic, nonsectarian school maintains written records of the training, and will provide written verification of the training upon request. The training shall comply with the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 56366.1.

(g) Commencing with the 2024–25 school year, for any pupil served by the school who is a foster child as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5, the school agrees to do both of the following:

(1) Serve as the school
 of origin of the foster child, as applicable pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 48853.5.

(2) Allow the foster child to continue their education in the school, as applicable pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 48853.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.   (AB 723)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.11.

(a) The department shall implement a program to integrate individuals with exceptional needs placed in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools into public schools, as appropriate. Under the program, a pupil placed in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school and each individual who has the right to make educational decisions for the pupil shall be informed of all his or her rights relating to the educational placement of the pupil. Existing dispute resolution procedures involving public school enrollment or attendance shall be explained to a pupil placed
 in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school in an age- and developmentally appropriate manner. The Foster Child Ombudsman shall disseminate the information on education rights to every foster child residing in a licensed children’s institution or foster family home.

(b) Following the development of the next statewide assessment contract, the department shall submit to the Legislature a report on the academic progress of pupils attending nonpublic, nonsectarian schools serving individuals with exceptional needs. Using the results of the two most recent years of the Standardized Testing and Reporting (STAR) Program and the California Alternative Performance Assessment, the report shall summarize by district the achievement of all pupils attending a nonpublic, nonsectarian school. The department shall ensure that the report does not violate the confidentiality of individual pupil scores. In addition, the report shall include an academic performance index
 score for pupils attending nonpublic, nonsectarian schools for each district using the same procedures as under Section 52052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.12.

A nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall ensure private and confidential communication, including telecommunication, between a pupil of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school and members of the pupil’s individualized education program team and the department’s Constituent Services Office, at the pupil’s discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 579, Sec. 6.   (SB 373)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56367.

(a) Placements in state special schools pursuant to Sections 59020, 59120, and 59220 shall be made only as a result of recommendations from the individualized education program team, upon a finding that no appropriate placement is available in the local plan area.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), referrals for further assessment and recommendations to the California Schools for the Deaf and Blind or the Diagnostic Centers, pursuant to Section 56326, shall
 not constitute placements in state special schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 17.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56368.
